California statutes. Public Resources Code
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Glen Helen Regional Park Property [5797. - 5797.8.]

5797.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “County” means the County of San Bernardino.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(c) “Glen Helen Regional Park property” means the 4.2 acres of property at Glen Helen Regional Park to be disposed of by the County of San Bernardino pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5797.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   (AB 385)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 5797.8.)
-------------------------------------------

5797.2.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the disposition of property at Glen Helen Regional Park and the acquisition of replacement park property of equal or greater recreational value authorized pursuant to this chapter is for the purpose of increasing recreational opportunities in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   (AB 385)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 5797.8.)
-------------------------------------------

5797.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the county, acting through its Regional Parks Department, may dispose up to 4.2 acres of property at Glen Helen Regional Park. The property to be disposed may include property used or unused for park purposes, including land acquired or improved with state grant moneys, including, but not limited to, grant moneys from the Roberti-Z’Berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program Act established in Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 5620), subject to acquisition of replacement park property of equal or greater recreational value, as approved by the department, and at no cost to the state or the
 county, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The county obtains an independent appraisal of the fair market value of the Glen Helen Regional Park property, as approved by the department, and submits the appraisal to the department on or before July 1, 2026.

(2) (A) The county submits a plan identifying the proposed replacement property to the department on or before January 1, 2027.

(B) The county obtains an independent appraisal of the fair market value of the proposed replacement park property to be acquired, as approved by the department, and submits the appraisal to the department on or before July 1, 2027.

(3) The fair market value of the proposed replacement park property is equal to or greater than the highest of the
 following:

(A) The fair market value of the Glen Helen Regional Park property.

(B) The actual sales price of the Glen Helen Regional Park property. If the disposition is an exchange of property, then only subparagraph (A) shall apply.

(4) The recreational utility to the public of the proposed replacement park property is equal to or greater than that of the Glen Helen Regional Park property, as approved by the department.

(5) On or before January 1, 2028, the county provides the department with all of the following:

(A) Preliminary title reports that set forth all liens, encumbrances, easements, restrictions, conditions, exceptions, and other matters of record affecting title to the Glen Helen Regional Park property and the proposed replacement park property.

(B) A written environmental site assessment on the proposed replacement park
 property that describes the presence, absence, and nature of all known hazardous substances, environmental problems, faults, defects, and violations located in, on, under, or around the proposed replacement park property.

(C) A written attestation from the county regarding the presence and nature of all known hazardous substances, environmental problems, faults, defects, and violations located in, on, under, or around the proposed replacement park property, including whether the county objects to those hazardous substances, environmental problems, faults, defects, or violations.

(D) A written feasibility study that evaluates the suitability of the proposed replacement park property for public recreation.

(E) A complete and detailed list of the “permitted exceptions” listed in the preliminary title reports for the Glen Helen Regional Park property and the proposed replacement park property that the county and current owner
 of the proposed replacement park property have agreed on.

(F) A complete and detailed list of all rights, liens, mortgages, and bonds that remain in force against both the Glen Helen Regional Park property and the proposed replacement park property, and the details of all agreements between the county and the current owner of the proposed replacement park property regarding the nature, payment, or retirement of those rights, liens, mortgages, and bonds.

(6) On or before July 1, 2028, and before the county disposes of the Glen Helen Regional Park property, the county provides the department with final title reports that set forth all liens, encumbrances, easements, restrictions, conditions, exceptions, and other matters of record, including a detailed list of the “permitted exceptions” listed in the final title reports that the county and current owner of the replacement park property have agreed on, that affect title to the Glen Helen Regional Park
 property or the proposed replacement park property.

(7) On or before July 1, 2028, and before the county’s acquisition of the proposed replacement park property, the county provides the department with a detailed written report of all known hazardous substances, environmental problems, faults, defects, and violations located in, on, under, or around the proposed replacement park property that have been corrected and a list of all those hazardous substances, environmental problems, faults, defects, or violations that have not been corrected.

(8) Upon the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, being met, and before the county disposes of the Glen Helen Regional Park property, the county enters into a final written agreement with the department, approved by the department, to transfer all of the county’s responsibilities and obligations pursuant to any grant contract applicable to the Glen Helen Regional Park property to the proposed
 replacement park property in perpetuity.

(b) Property acquired pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used for park purposes and shall be subject to all applicable state law requirements, including, if applicable, the requirements of the Roberti-Z’Berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program Act established in Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 5620).

(c) Replacement park
 property, as approved by the department pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be acquired either before or concurrently with the disposition of Glen Helen Regional Park
 property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   (AB 385)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 5797.8.)
-------------------------------------------

5797.6.

Consistent with this chapter, any land exchanged for property at Glen Helen Regional Park pursuant to Section 5797.4 shall satisfy all of the following:

(a) Be replacement park property of comparable recreational and open space characteristics and of equal or greater size.

(b) Be located in an area accessible for use by the same general population that used the disposed property.

(c) Include replacement facilities of the same type and number, as applicable, with
 development costs for the replacement property and facilities being substantially equivalent to the value of the disposed property. This subdivision shall not be construed to require the replacement property to include a residential building.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   (AB 385)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 5797.8.)
-------------------------------------------

5797.8.

If the county has not acquired replacement park property, as approved by the department pursuant to this chapter, on or before January 1, 2029, this chapter shall become inoperative on January 1, 2029.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   (AB 385)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Watershed Lands [5800. - 5804.]

5800.

As used in this chapter “public entity” means any county, city, or public district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

5801.

Whenever any public entity acquires, or has acquired, land for the purpose of watershed protection, it shall not sell such land without complying with the provisions of this chapter. As used in this section, “land” does not include easements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

5802.

Except as provided in Section 5803, all sales by a public entity of land described in Section 5801 shall first be approved by ordinance which shall state that it is subject to the provisions for referendum applicable to such public entity.

Any ordinance subject to referendum under this section shall be published after adoption as required by law for ordinances of the public entity generally, or, if there be no such requirement applicable to such ordinance, then once, pursuant to the provisions of Section 6040 to 6044, inclusive, of the Government Code, within 15 days after the adoption of such ordinance.

Any petition protesting the adoption of the ordinance shall be filed with the public entity within 30 days from the date of final passage of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

5803.

This chapter shall not apply to sales or exchanges to adjacent landowners, sales incident to land acquisitions, sales or transfers to other public entities, or sales of parcels of 10 acres or less in size, except that any such sales or transfers shall be approved at a public meeting of the governing body of the public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

5804.

If a public entity does not have statutory power to enact ordinances, the governing body of such public entity is hereby empowered to introduce and enact the ordinance required by Section 5802 at any regular or adjourned regular meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. California Watershed Protection and Restoration Act [5808. - 5808.2.]

5808.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Watershed Protection and Restoration Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 693, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5808.1.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) In addition to the statutory and regulatory policies and programs established pursuant to the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), Division 20.4 (commencing with Section 30901), and Chapter 1.696 (commencing with Section 5096.600) of Division 5, Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) and Division 26.5 (commencing with Section 79500) of the Water Code, and other statutes and regulations affecting watershed planning and protection, efforts to conserve, maintain, restore, protect, enhance, and utilize California’s rivers and streams for habitat, recreation, water supply, public health, economic development, and other purposes have a greater likelihood of being successful when governments, including federal and tribal governments, work in partnership with citizens in an effort to combine community resources, local initiative, and state agency support.

(b) The Legislature enacted Assembly Bill 2117 of the 1999–2000 Regular Session (Ch. 735, Stats. 2000) to require the California Environmental Protection Agency and the Resources Agency to evaluate how effective voluntary, community-based, collaborative watershed efforts or partnerships are in contributing to the protection and enhancement of California’s natural resources, and what the state can do to assist them.

(c) The agencies produced a Report to the Legislature: Addressing the Need to Protect California’s Watersheds—Working with Local Partnerships, April 2002.

(d) The recommendations of that report form the basis and factual support for promoting and encouraging local partnerships in watershed restoration, protection, and management as one of the nonregulatory means of improving watersheds.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that this act will bring more understanding to government agencies of the nature, scope, and complexity of working on a watershed basis at the local and regional level.

(f) To the extent consistent with the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), Division 20.4 (commencing with Section 30901) and Chapter 1.696 (commencing with Section 5096.600) of Division 5, Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) and Division 26.5 (commencing with Section 79500) of the Water Code, and other statutes and regulations affecting watershed planning and protection, the California Environmental Protection Agency and the Resources Agency are encouraged to provide assistance and grants under this chapter in a uniform and predictable manner to those who choose to participate in the important work of watershed restoration and enhancement pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 693, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5808.2.

(a) In addition to the statutory and regulatory policies and programs established pursuant to the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), Division 20.4 (commencing with Section 30901) and Chapter 1.696 (commencing with Section 5096.600) of Division 5, Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) and Division 26.5 (commencing with Section 79500) of the Water Code, and other statutes and regulations affecting watershed planning and protection, voluntary local collaborative partnerships that assist in improving the condition of the watershed as expeditiously as possible are in the state’s interest in terms of effectiveness, citizen involvement, and community responsibility.

(b) The use of local and regional watershed level planning and management can be an efficient and effective mechanism to improve the condition of the watershed.

(c) To the extent consistent with the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), Division 20.4 (commencing with Section 30901) and Chapter 1.696 (commencing with Section 5096.600) of Division 5, Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) and Division 26.5 (commencing with Section 79500) of the Water Code, and other statutes and regulations affecting watershed planning and protection, the memorandum of understanding required under Section 30946, guidelines adopted by state agencies for use by local watershed partnerships shall provide flexible mechanisms to achieve quantifiable, and monitored watershed objectives.

(d) In addition to the statutory and regulatory policies and programs established pursuant to the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), Division 20.4 (commencing with Section 30901) and Chapter 1.696 (commencing with Section 5096.600) of Division 5, Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) and Division 26.5 (commencing with Section 79500) of the Water Code, and other statutes and regulations affecting watershed planning and protection, local governments, special districts, and other interested parties may participate in local watershed partnerships in order to ensure efficient, long-lasting, and effective watershed restoration and management and to improve the watershed.

(e) To the extent funds that are available for the purposes in subdivision (d), state agencies with jurisdiction over watershed planning and protection may provide technical assistance to watershed management partnerships through training, advice, and manuals describing assessments, plans, and monitoring activities that are consistent with watershed protection laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 693, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Wetlands Preservation [5810. - 5818.1.]

5810.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Keene-Nejedly California Wetlands Preservation Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 462.)
-------------------------------------------

5811.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The remaining wetlands of this state are of increasingly critical economic, aesthetic, and scientific value to the people of California, and that the need exists for an affirmative and sustained public policy and program directed at their preservation, restoration, and enhancement, in order that wetlands shall continue in perpetuity to meet the needs of the people.

(b) Although the state established a specific plan in 1979 for the protection, acquisition, restoration, preservation, and management of wetlands to be implemented through the year 2000, a need to update this plan now exists, and the process should include the identification of priorities for wetland conservation through the year 2020.

(c) California has established a successful program of regional, cooperative efforts to protect, acquire, restore, preserve, and manage wetlands. These programs include, but are not limited to, the Central Valley Habitat Joint Venture, the San Francisco Bay Joint Venture, the Southern California Wetlands Recovery Project, and the Inter-Mountain West Joint Venture. These public-private partnerships, wherever practicable, shall be the primary means of achieving the objectives of this chapter.

(d) Active and voluntary involvement by private landowners in wetlands conservation, restoration, and enhancement contributes significantly to the long-term availability and productivity of wetlands in the state.

(e) With the passage of Propositions 12 and 13 in March 2000, the people of California have provided the state with unprecedented financial resources to acquire, restore, preserve, and manage wetlands. There is a pressing need for state agencies that are responsible for wetlands conservation to develop and disseminate a wetlands conservation strategy for review by the general public, for use by the Legislature in the annual budget process, for use by local public agencies in pursuing local and regional wetlands conservation programs, and for use by state agencies updating existing programs for acquiring, restoring, preserving, and managing wetlands resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 964, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5812.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning, the following terms mean:

(a) “Agency” means the Resources Agency.

(b) “Departments” means the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Fish and Game, and the California Coastal Conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 964, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5813.

(a) Nothing in this chapter abrogates or supersedes any existing local, state, or federal law or policy pertaining to wetlands, or establishes maximum or minimum standards or any other requirement for wetlands fill or mitigation. Additionally, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create any new legal obligations for private landowners, or for lands owned by the United States Department of Defense, for wetlands inventories, wetlands management requirements, or any other regulatory requirements pertaining to wetlands use or conversion.

(b) Any of the departments may acquire interests in real property less than the fee, including, but not limited to, acquisition of development rights, when it determines that acquisition of the lesser interest will accomplish the purposes of this chapter in furthering the public’s interest in the protection, preservation, restoration, and enhancement of wetlands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 964, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5814.

(a) The agency shall update all of the state’s existing wetlands inventory resources in order to prepare a study to accomplish the following goals:

(1) To identify the restoration and enhancement opportunities in the state for wetlands in public ownership.

(2) To identify means of protecting and enhancing existing wetlands in public ownership and to identify additional recreational benefits and opportunities that are compatible with the primary goal of maximizing the habitat value of wetlands.

(3) To identify opportunities for voluntary public-private partnerships for wetlands restoration, enhancement, and management on private lands.

(4) To identify those wetlands of particular significance in the state that are not currently in public ownership for which there is believed to be a willing seller.

(5) To identify additional recreational benefits that can be provided on existing, restored, or newly created wetlands in public ownership or for which there is a cooperative agreement for public use by a private landowner and a local, state, or federal agency.

(6) To provide a basis for the inclusion of wetlands data and information in the California Continuing Resources Investment Strategy Project (CCRISP), which was funded in the Budget Act of 2000.

(7) To identify, utilizing existing resources, wetlands on lands owned by federal agencies in California and those wetlands that are protected by existing wetlands management and conservation mandates imposed by federal law.

(8) To identify, in conjunction with the Office of Planning and Research, those instances where lead agencies have adopted mitigation measures pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000), or natural community conservation plans prepared pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of the Fish and Game Code, that utilize or reference wetland resources located on lands owned by the United States Department of Defense.

(b) The agency shall consult and cooperate with counties cities, other appropriate state and federal agencies with an interest in wetlands resources, and willing landowners in conducting the study. The study shall be submitted to the Legislature not later than January 1, 2003, and shall set forth, for consideration by the Legislature, a plan for the acquisition, protection, preservation, restoration, and enhancement of wetlands, including funding requirements and the priority status of specific proposed wetlands projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 964, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5815.

The agency, in preparing the wetlands priority plan and program pursuant to Section 5814, shall give particular recognition to the conservation, recreation, and open-space plans and programs of local agencies, and shall, wherever feasible and appropriate, identify and devise cooperative means for planning and for the protection and preservation of wetlands by local agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 964, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5815.5.

In compiling data for the wetlands inventory required by Section 5814, the agency and the departments shall, as a first priority, rely on existing sources of information and data. If the agency determines that ground surveys are needed to supplement or correct aerial and satellite imagery, the agency and the department shall obtain the permission of any private landowner before entering his or her property to gather information to complete the wetlands inventory.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 964, Sec. 5.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5816.

The agency shall give particular recognition to opportunities for protecting and preserving wetlands lying within, or adjacent to, existing units of the state park system or other state-owned lands protected and managed primarily as wildlife habitat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 964, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5817.

Any of the departments may enter into operating agreements with cities, counties, and districts for the management and control of wetlands, or interests in wetlands, acquired pursuant to this chapter. However, any agreement shall ensure the protection and preservation of the wetlands and ensure the right of use and enjoyment of the wetlands by the people of the state. Further, any agreement entered into by the Department of Fish and Game pursuant to this section shall provide that public use of lands and waters subject to the agreement shall be in accordance with regulations adopted by the Fish and Game Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 964, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5818.

All acquisitions made pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850), Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 462.)
-------------------------------------------

5818.1.

(a) The Coastal Wetlands Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury and shall be an interest-bearing fund administered by the Department of Fish and Game.

(b) Effective June 30, 2024, the Coastal Wetlands Fund, established pursuant to subdivision (a), is abolished and any remaining balance, assets, liabilities, and encumbrances shall revert to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 39.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Sierra Nevada-Cascade Conservation Grant Program [5819. - 5819.8.]

5819.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions govern this chapter:

(a) “Acquisition” means obtaining fee title or a lesser interest in real property, including an easement, development right, or water right.

(b) “Development” includes, but is not limited to, improvement, rehabilitation, restoration, enhancement, preservation, protection, and interpretation.

(c) “Interpretation” includes, but is not limited to, visitor serving amenities that communicate the significance and value of natural, historical, and cultural resources in a manner that increases understanding of those resources.

(d) “Nonprofit organization” means a private, nonprofit organization that qualifies for exempt status under paragraph (3) of subsection (c) Section 501 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(e) “Program” means the Sierra Nevada-Cascade Conservation Grant Program established pursuant to this chapter.

(f) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Resources Agency.

(g) “Sierra Nevada-Cascade Mountain Region” or “region” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 5096.347.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 15.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5819.1.

(a) This chapter establishes the Sierra Nevada-Cascade Conservation Grant Program in the Resources Agency.

(b) The secretary shall administer the program.

(c) The program applies only in the Sierra Nevada-Cascade Mountain Region.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 15.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5819.2.

(a) The secretary shall administer the program consistent with authorized funding, and collaborate and cooperate with local governments and interested parties.

(b) The purposes of the program include all of the following:

(1) Providing increased opportunities for tourism and recreation in the region.

(2) Protecting water quality in the region from degradation.

(3) Reducing the risk of natural disasters, such as fire, in the region.

(4) Protecting, conserving, and restoring the region’s physical, cultural, archaeological, and historical resources.

(5) Assisting the region’s economy, including providing increased economic opportunities.

(6) Identifying the highest priority projects and initiatives in the region for which funding is needed.

(7) Enhancing public use and enjoyment of land in the region that is owned by the state or a local government.

(8) Supporting efforts that advance, in a complementary manner, environmental preservation of the region and the economic well-being of the region’s residents.

(9) Helping to preserve working landscapes in the region.

(10) Supporting local government efforts to develop and implement open space and habitat protection plans, including natural community conservation plans, in the region.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 15.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5819.3.

(a) The secretary may undertake projects and activities to further the purposes identified in Section 5819.2. Those projects and activities may include providing grants and loans to public agencies and nonprofit organizations for acquisition, restoration, development, and other activities and projects, that are necessary to meet the purposes identified in Section 5819.2. The projects and activities undertaken by the secretary, including the providing of grants and loans, shall be consistent with any restrictions related to the source of moneys that are used to fund those activities and projects.

(b) In administering this chapter, the secretary shall collaborate and cooperate with the city or county in which a grant is proposed to be used or an interest in land is proposed to be acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 15.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5819.4.

To implement Section 79544 of the Water Code, the secretary may provide grants to local public agencies, local water districts, and nonprofit organizations, for acquisition in the region pursuant to this chapter and consistent with Section 79544 of the Water Code, only for the following purposes:

(a) Acquiring agricultural, forest, or grazing land, or other working landscapes, to prevent conversion of that land to uses that could decrease water quality in the region and degrade habitat values, or to convert that land to uses that could improve water quality in the region and habitat.

(b) Acquiring land adjacent to or affecting rivers, streams, lakes, or wetlands, that, if not protected, could lead to a decrease in water quality in the region.

(c) Purchasing water rights that will protect both water quality and in stream flow, in the region, for resource protection.

(d) Acquiring land that mitigates or prevents current or anticipated management practices that contribute to water quality degradation in the region.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 15.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5819.5.

The secretary shall require an applicant for a grant for land or water resource acquisition to include in the grant application a proposal for the long-term management of the resource that the applicant proposes to acquire. The applicant shall identify the entity that will hold title to the resource, including any state or federal agency to which title may be transferred after acquisition, and the entity that will be responsible for managing and protecting the water quality value of the resource.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 15.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5819.6.

An acquisition made pursuant to this chapter shall be from a willing seller.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 15.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5819.7.

All regulations, criteria, and procedural guides that the secretary adopts to implement this chapter are exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 15.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5819.8.

It is the intent of the Legislature to provide in any legislation that establishes a Sierra Nevada Conservancy an appropriate transition from the program established by this chapter within the Resources Agency to the new conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 15.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Mendocino Woodlands Outdoor Center [5820. - 5829.]

5820.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Mendocino Woodlands Outdoor Center Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1301.)
-------------------------------------------

5821.

The Legislature finds that there is need for a program to enable the children of the state to better comprehend the outdoors, particularly the social and economic importance of the study, conservation, protection, and utilization of natural resources. The Legislature further finds that the location and facilities of the Mendocino Woodlands Outdoor Center are especially well suited to serve primarily as an outdoor education center under the control and management of the Department of Parks and Recreation, as a unit of the state park system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1301.)
-------------------------------------------

5822.

The Legislature hereby declares its intent that the Mendocino Woodlands Outdoor Center, consisting of land and facilities deeded to the State of California by the United States of America for public park, recreational, and conservation purposes, shall hereafter be maintained, provided, and operated for the benefit of the people of the state, primarily as an outdoor environmental education facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1301.)
-------------------------------------------

5823.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(b) “Center” means the Mendocino Woodlands Outdoor Center, consisting of 720 acres, more or less, of state-owned land and improvements located within the east half of the Northeast Quarter and the east half of the Southeast Quarter of Section 13 of the east half and southwest quarter of the Northeast Quarter and the east half and southwest quarter of the Southeast Quarter of Section 24 of T. 17 N., R. 17 W., M.D.B.M.; the north half and southwest quarter of the Northwest Quarter and the north half of the Northeast Quarter of Section 18 of, and the west half of the Northwest Quarter of Section 30 of, T. 17 N., R. 16 W., M.D.B.M.

(c) “Area” means the Mendocino Woodlands Special Treatment Area within the Jackson State Forest, consisting of 2,550 acres, more or less, of state-owned lands lying within the south half of Section 12 of; the Northwest Quarter, the west half of the Northeast Quarter, the west half of the Southeast Quarter, and the Southwest Quarter of Section 13 of, the Northeast, Southeast, and Southwest Quarters of Section 14 of, the northeast quarter of the Northeast Quarter of Section 22 of, the north half of Section 23 of, the Northwest Quarter, the northwest quarter of the Northeast Quarter, and the northeast quarter of the Southwest Quarter of Section 24 of, T. 17 N., R. 17 W., M.D.B.M.; and the Southwest Quarter of Section 7 of the southeast quarter of the Northwest Quarter, the south half of the Northeast Quarter, the northwest, northeast, and southwest quarters of the Southeast Quarter and the Southwest Quarter of Section 18 of, and the Northwest Quarter and the west half of the Southwest Quarter of Section 19 of, T. 17 N., R. 16 W., M.D.B.M.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1301.)
-------------------------------------------

5824.

Jurisdiction and control of the center, consisting of 720 acres, more or less, and all the improvements thereon as described in subdivision (b) of Section 5823 is hereby transferred to the department from the Department of Conservation, and shall be administered as a unit of the state park system; except that access shall be provided through the center to the area, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 5823, for purposes of cutting timber under the authority of the State Forester exercised pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 4645) of Chapter 9 of Part 2 of Division 4, in a manner acceptable to the State Forester.

It is the intent of the Legislature that title in the aforementioned lands and facilities shall continue to vest in the State of California; and if for any reason their use for the purposes of this chapter be deemed by the department no longer to be in the public interest, then they shall be restored through future legislation to the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Conservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1301.)
-------------------------------------------

5826.

The department shall consult with the Department of Education, and may cooperate with individuals and agencies having jurisdiction or expertise in matters pertaining to the outdoor education programs contemplated in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1301.)
-------------------------------------------

5827.

The department may enter into operating agreements with any qualified, nonprofit entity for the provision of any program or service contemplated in this chapter. Prior to entering into any such agreement, the department shall submit a copy of the proposed agreement to the Legislative Analyst for his review and recommendations, which shall not, however, be binding. Failure of the Legislative Analyst to respond within 30 days after submission of a proposed agreement shall be deemed to constitute approval by the Legislative Analyst of the proposed agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1301.)
-------------------------------------------

5828.

The department is encouraged to establish an advisory committee of persons interested and knowledgeable in the operation and nature of the center, and in the formulation and conduct of outdoor environmental education programs, to assist it in formulating the plan and actions contemplated in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1301.)
-------------------------------------------

5829.

Prior to authorizing the sale and cutting of timber from the area described in subdivision (c) of Section 5823, the State Forester shall solicit and consider the recommendations of the Department of Parks and Recreation with respect to the prevention of unnecessary or unreasonable interruption or loss of facilities or resources essential to center operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1301.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Bushy Lake Preservation [5830. - 5835.]

5830.

This chapter may be cited as the Bushy Lake Preservation Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 665.)
-------------------------------------------

5831.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

(a) “California Exposition flood plain” means that portion of state-owned California Exposition land in the American River flood plain as it exists on January 1, 1977.

(b) “Bushy Lake area” means that portion of the California Exposition flood plain bounded by the continuous line enclosing Bushy Lake, which line is 100 feet outside the 25-foot elevation contour line as limited on the north side by the waterside toe of the levee and as limited on the west side by a line 100 feet east of State Highway Route 80 as it exists on January 1, 1977.
